Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB558.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 38 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IIILEGAL HOLIDAYSChapter21. Election DayCHAPTER 21ELECTION DAYSec.2101. Definitions.2102. Observance of Election Day as a legal holiday.§ 2101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 12345678910111213141516171819 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Election Day." The day of a general election, municipal election or primary election."General election." The election held biennially on the Tuesday next following the first Monday of November in each even-numbered year."Municipal corporation." A city, borough, incorporated town or township."Municipal election." The election held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday of November in each odd-numbered year."Primary election." An election for the nomination of candidates."Private employer." An employer that is engaged in business in this Commonwealth. The term does not include a public employer, school district or county."Public employer."(1) Any of the following:(i) T he Commonwealth. (ii) A municipal corporation.(2) The term does not include a county or school district.§ 2102. Observance of Election Day as a legal holiday.(a) Observance.--A public employer shall observe Election Day as a legal holiday.(b) Other public entities.--A school district or county may observe Election Day as a legal holiday.(c) Private employers.--20250SB0558PN0550 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) On Election Day, a private employer shall provide no less than two hours of unpaid leave to its employees for the purpose of voting.(2) A private employer that violates paragraph (1) shall pay a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 to the county board of elections.(d) Enforcement.--The department shall enforce the provisions of this section and may promulgate regulations necessary to enforce the provisions of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0558PN0550 - 3 - 12345678910